Utah statutes.
35A-8-420.   Rights of obligees of authority.

An obligee of an authority, in addition to all other rights conferred on the obligee subject to any contractual restrictions binding upon the obligee, may:

(1)  compel an authority, its officers, agents, or employees to perform each term, provision, and covenant contained in a contract of the authority for the benefit of the obligee and to require the carrying out of all covenants and agreements of the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon it by this part; and

(2)  enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of an obligee of the authority.

